Missouri, session 2026, SB1312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 393.1690, to read as
follows:
393.1690. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Internet service interruption", an interruption
in internet service to a customer if such internet service
interruption was not caused by the customer.
2. Notwithstanding any law, rule, order, decision,
permit, agreement, contract, or any other relevant authority
to the contrary, an internet service provider shall provide
an automatic fifty percent discount to a customer's internet
bill if the customer experienced three internet service
interruptions lasting thirty minutes per each internet
service interruption within a thirty day period.
3. An internet service provider shall create a form on
the internet service provider's website on which customers
may record each instance of internet service interruption,

SB 1312 2
including, but not limited to: date, time, geographic
location, and duration of each internet service
interruption. The information submitted on the form under
this subsection shall be stored into each customer's file
and made available to customers by the internet service
provider.
4. The commission shall require an internet service
provider to maintain a record detailing each instance of an
internet service interruption. The record shall not include
disconnection of internet service to customers for good
cause. The record shall include:
(1) Date, time, and duration of an internet service
interruption;
(2) Number of customers affected by the internet
service interruption;
(3) Description of the cause of the internet service
interruption, including any equipment involved in the
internet service interruption, if applicable;
(4) Geographical area where internet service
interruption occurred;
(5) Measures taken by the internet provider to restore
internet service;
(6) Measures taken by the internet provider to prevent
future internet service interruptions.
5. Copies of the record detailing information required
under subsection 4 of this section shall be made public by
an internet service provider on the internet service
provider's website.
6. The commission shall promulgate rules to ensure
compliance with provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in

SB 1312 3
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓